New York, session 2025-2026, A886.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 666 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 666. Non-preemption clause. Nothing in this article or any other 4 provision of law shall be deemed to prohibit any municipality from 5 establishing or enforcing within its geographic boundaries payment of 6 minimum wage of benefits standards that are higher or more protective 7 than those established pursuant to this article. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03366-01-5